Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-2909
Conditions for disclosure.

In addition to provision for payment of applicable fees, the department may, prior to the disclosure of personal information as permitted under section 60-2906 or 60-2907, require the meeting of conditions by the requester for the purposes of obtaining reasonable assurance concerning the identity of the requester and, to the extent required, that the information will only be used as authorized or that the consent of the person who is the subject of the information has been obtained. Such conditions shall include, but need not be limited to, the making and filing of a form containing such information and verification as the department may prescribe.

Laws 1997, LB 635, § 9.